Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1905
Nonconsensual common-law lien; how
treated.

A
nonconsensual common-law lien is not binding or enforceable at law or in equity.
Any nonconsensual common-law lien that is recorded is void and unenforceable.

Laws 2013, LB3, § 4.